Mississippi, session 2026, SB2320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-21-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-21-39.  (1)  (a)  An owner who scraps, dismantles or destroys a vehicle and a person who purchases a vehicle as scrap or to be dismantled or destroyed shall indicate same on the back of the certificate of title and shall immediately cause the certificate of title and any other documents required by the department to be mailed or delivered to the department for cancellation.  A certificate of title of the vehicle shall not again be issued except upon application containing the information the department requires, accompanied by a certificate of inspection in the form and content specified in Section 63-21-15(5) and proof of payment of a fee as provided in subsection (2) of this section.  Before a used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor may purchase or receive a motor vehicle from the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the motor vehicle for the purpose of scrapping, dismantling or destroying the motor vehicle, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor must verify under Section 63-21-18 the absence of any lien on the motor vehicle.  If a lien exists on the motor vehicle, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor may not purchase or receive the motor vehicle for the purpose of scrapping, dismantling or destroying the vehicle, and may not purchase or receive the motor vehicle for such purposes during any time for which a lien exists on the motor vehicle. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, if the owner or authorized agent of the owner has not obtained a title in his or her name for the vehicle to be transferred, has lost the title for the vehicle to be transferred, or has returned the title to the department in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection, he or she may sign a statement swearing that, in addition to the foregoing conditions, the vehicle is at least ten (10) model years old.  The statement described in this paragraph may be used only to transfer such a vehicle to a licensed used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor.  The department shall promulgate a form for the statement which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) A statement that the vehicle shall never be titled again; it must be dismantled or scrapped; (ii) A description of the vehicle including the year, make, model and vehicle identification number; (iii) The name, address, and driver's license number, nondriver identification card number or tribal identification card number of the owner; (iv) A certification that the owner: 1. Never obtained a title to the vehicle in his or her name; or 2. Was issued a title for the vehicle, but the title was lost or stolen; (v) A certification that the vehicle: 1. Is at least ten (10) model years old; and 2. Is not subject to any security interest or lien; (vi) An acknowledgment that the owner and buyer of the vehicle realizes this form will be filed with the department and that: 1. It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for conviction of a first offense of knowingly falsifying any information on this statement; and 2. It is a felony, punishable by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both, for conviction of a second or subsequent offense of knowingly falsifying any information on this statement; (vii) The owner's signature and the date of the transaction; (viii) The name and address of the business acquiring the vehicle; (ix) The National Motor Vehicle Title Information System identification number; and (x) The business agent's signature and date along with a printed name and title if the agent is signing on behalf of a corporation. (c) Until such time as the department makes available an Internet-based system, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall mail or otherwise deliver the statement required under paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) to the department within three (3) business days of the completion of the transaction, requesting that the department cancel the Mississippi certificate of title and registration.   Once the department develops an Internet-based system, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall utilize such system and within two (2) business days electronically submit the information contained in the statement using that system. (d)  Within two (2) business days of each day's close of business, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor who purchases or receives motor vehicles for scrap or for parts shall deliver in a format approved by the department, by electronic means once developed and made available by the department, a list of all such vehicles purchased that day for scrap or for parts.  That list shall contain the following information: (i)  The name, address and contact information for the reporting entity; (ii)  The vehicle identification numbers of such vehicles; (iii)  The dates such vehicles were obtained; (iv)  The names of the individuals or entities from whom the vehicles were obtained, for use by law enforcement personnel and appropriate governmental agencies only; (v)  A statement of whether the vehicles were, or will be, crushed or disposed of, or offered for sale or other purposes; (vi)  A statement of whether the vehicle is intended for export out of the United States; and (vii)  The National Motor Vehicle Title Information System identification number of the business acquiring the vehicle. In addition, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor must certify compliance with the requirements of Section 63-21-39(1)(a). (e)  (i)  For purposes of this subsection, the term "motor vehicle" shall not include a vehicle which has been crushed or flattened by mechanical means such that it is no longer the motor vehicle as described by the certificate of title, or such that the vehicle identification number is no longer visible or accessible. (ii)  In cases in which crushed or flattened vehicles are purchased or received, the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall verify that the seller has reported the vehicles in accordance with this subsection.  Such verification may be in the form of a certification from the seller or a contract between the seller and the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor attesting to the seller's compliance with the reporting requirements of this subsection.  Such verification must clearly identify the seller by a government issued photograph identification card or employer identification number, and the verification and copy of the identification card or number shall be maintained by the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor for a period of not less than two (2) years. (f)  The information obtained by the department in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) shall be reported to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System, in a format that will satisfy the requirement for reporting this information, in accordance with rules adopted by the United States Department of Justice in 28 CFR 25.56. (g)  Until such time as the department develops and makes available the Internet-based system described in paragraph (d) of this subsection, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor who purchases or receives motor vehicles for scrap or for parts shall deliver the information required by paragraph (d) to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System through any data consolidator approved by such system, within forty-eight (48) hours of the day the vehicle was purchased or acquired by such used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor which shall satisfy the requirements of paragraph (d). (h)  The information obtained by the department in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) shall be made available only to law enforcement agencies and for purposes of canceling certificates of title.  The information shall otherwise be considered to be confidential business information of the respective reporting entities. (i)  All records required under the provisions of this subsection shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years by the reporting entity and shall include a scanned or photocopied copy of the seller's or seller's representative's driver's license or state-issued identification card or other valid form of identification. (j)  A person who knowingly and willfully violates this subsection (1), or any person who knowingly and willfully falsifies or assists another person in falsifying the statement or information required under paragraph (b) or (d) of this subsection, or any person who knowingly and willfully sells a vehicle upon which there is an unsatisfied lien or security interest, or who purchases a vehicle without complying with either paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection and who knowingly and willfully destroys or dismantles a vehicle upon which he knows that there is an unsatisfied lien or security interest shall: (i)  Be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for conviction of a first offense; or (ii) Upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years or a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both. In addition, the court may order each person convicted to pay restitution to any party suffering monetary loss in the amount of such loss.  No part of any sentence imposed by the court shall be suspended unless such restitution has been paid in full. (k)  A person who knowingly and willfully fails to deliver the title as required under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or the statement required under paragraph (b) of this subsection to the department within seventy-two (72) hours of the completion of the transaction, or who, until such time as the department develops and makes available the Internet-based system described in paragraph (d), fails to deliver the information required by paragraph (d) to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System through any data consolidator approved by such system, within two (2) business days of the day the vehicle was purchased or acquired by such used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall be in violation of this section, and subject to a civil penalty of up to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation.  Actions to impose this penalty may be brought by any local or state law enforcement agency, district attorney, or by the Attorney General, in any court of competent jurisdiction.  One-half (1/2) of the monies generated from such civil penalties shall be deposited in a special fund created in the State Treasury for use by the department's Title Bureau, and one-half (1/2) of the monies generated from such civil penalties shall be deposited in the general fund of the municipality if the suit was brought in a municipal court, or in the general fund of the county if the suit was brought in the court of a county. (2)  For the purpose of requesting a branded title on a vehicle with a salvage certificate of title, every owner of a vehicle that has been issued a salvage certificate of title in this state or any other state which has been restored in this state to its operating condition which existed prior to the event which caused the salvage certificate of title to be issued shall make application to the department, accompanied by a certificate of inspection issued by the Department of Public Safety in the form and content specified in Section 63-21-15(5) and the payment of a fee of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) for each motor vehicle for which a certificate of inspection is issued.  In addition, the Department of Public Safety may charge such a person a fee in the amount of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for performing any vehicle identification number verification required by federal law or regulation for the vehicle for which the person is applying for a title.  All such monies shall be collected by the Department of Public Safety and paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in a special fund that is hereby created in the State Treasury to be known as the "Salvage Certificate of Title Fund."  Monies in the special fund may be expended by the Department of Public Safety, upon appropriation by the Legislature.  The department shall establish by regulation the minimum requirements by which a vehicle which has been issued a salvage certificate of title may be issued a branded title. (3)  Before a branded title may be issued for a vehicle for which a salvage certificate of title has been issued, the applicant shall submit, by hand delivery or mail, such documents and information to the Department of Public Safety as the department may require for the purpose of determining if the vehicle complies with the requirements of this section and all applicable regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Public Safety and the department.  The Department of Public Safety also may require that an applicant bring a vehicle for which application for a branded title is being made to a Highway Patrol facility for a visual inspection whenever the department deems that a visual inspection is necessary or advisable.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit inspectors of the Mississippi Highway Patrol from conducting on-site inspections and investigations of motor vehicle rebuilders or motor vehicle repair businesses to determine if such businesses are in compliance with all applicable laws relating to the motor vehicle title laws of this state and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Public Safety and the department. SECTION 2.  Section 97-17-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-17-71.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section: (a)  "Railroad materials" means any materials, equipment and parts used in the construction, operation, protection and maintenance of a railroad. (b)  "Copper materials" means any copper wire, bars, rods or tubing, including copper wire or cable or coaxial cable of the type used by public utilities, common carriers or communication services providers, whether wireless or wire line, copper air conditioner evaporator coil or condenser, aluminum copper radiators not attached to a motor vehicle, or any combination of these. (c)  "Aluminum materials" means any aluminum cable, bars, rods or tubing of the type used to construct utility, communication or broadcasting towers, aluminum utility wire and aluminum irrigation pipes or tubing.  "Aluminum materials" does not include aluminum cans that have served their original economic purpose. (d)  "Dealer-to-dealer transaction(s)" means any transaction of regulated metals, regardless of compensation, between registered scrap metal dealers. (e)  "Law enforcement officer" means any person appointed or employed full time by the state or any political subdivision thereof, or by the state military department as provided in Section 33-1-33, who is duly sworn and vested with authority to bear arms and make arrests, and whose primary responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime, the apprehension of criminals and the enforcement of the criminal traffic laws of this state or the ordinances of any political subdivision thereof. (f)  "Metal property" means materials as defined in this section as railroad track materials, copper materials and aluminum materials and electrical, communications or utility brass, metal covers for service access and entrances to sewers and storm drains, metal bridge pilings, irrigation wiring and other metal property attached to or part of center pivots, grain bins, stainless steel sinks, catalytic converters not attached to a motor vehicle and metal beer kegs.  Metal property does not include ferrous materials not listed in this section. (g)  "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, joint venture, trust, limited liability company, association or any other legal or commercial entity. (h)  "Personal identification card" means any government issued photographic identification card including a valid identification card issued by a federally recognized Indian tribe that contains a color photograph of the card holder and the card holder's legal name, residence address and date of birth. (i) "Photograph" or "photographically" means a still photographic image, including images captured in digital format, that are of such quality that the persons and objects depicted are clearly identifiable. (j)  "Purchase transaction" means a transaction in which metal property is acquired whether the person acquiring the metal property gives consideration for the metal property or not.  For purposes of Sections 97-17-71 through 97-17-71.3, the words "purchase" and "purchased" mean a purchase transaction. (k) "Purchaser" means a person who acquires metal property, whether the person gives consideration for the metal property or not. (l)  "Record" or "records" means a paper, electronic or other method of storing information. (m)  "Registered business entity" means a business entity created by statute, registered and in good standing with its state of incorporation or formation, and having a federal Employer Identification Number (EIN).  This term does not include any sole proprietorship, fictitious business name, or nonstatutory general partnership. (n)  "Scrap metal" means any metal property that is acquired by a scrap metal dealer in a purchase transaction. (o)  "Scrap metal dealer" means any person who is engaged, from a fixed location or otherwise, acquiring by purchase transaction, metal property that has served its original economic purpose, whether or not the person is engaged in the business of performing the manufacturing process by which metals are converted into raw material products consisting of prepared grades and having an existing or potential economic value.  Any person who falls under this definition must register as a scrap metal dealer pursuant to Sections 97-17-71 through 97-17-71.3 and its rules. (2)  Every scrap metal dealer or other purchaser shall keep an accurate and legible record in which he shall enter the following information for each purchase transaction: (a)  The name, address and age of the person from whom the metal property is purchased as obtained from the seller's personal identification card; (i)  If a person other than the seller delivers the metal property to the purchaser, the purchaser shall enter the name, address, and age of the person who delivers the metal property, as obtained from the personal identification card of the person delivering the metal property.  If the person delivering the metal property is the employee of the scrap metal dealer acting in his official capacity and at the direction of the scrap metal dealer, the purchaser is not required to enter the name, address, and age of the person who delivers the metal property. (ii)  If the seller is a registered business entity, and a person other than the seller delivers the metal property to the purchaser, in addition to the information required by this paragraph (a), the purchaser shall enter the name, principal business address, state of incorporation or formation of the entity, the federal Employer Identification Number (EIN) of the entity, and the name and telephone number of a contact person for the seller; (b)  The date and place of each acquisition of the metal property; (c)  The weight, quantity or volume and a general physical description of the type of metal property, such as wire, tubing, extrusions or casting, acquired in a purchase transaction; (d)  The amount of consideration given in a purchase transaction for the metal property.  If no consideration is given, a record of the origin of the regulated metal; (e)  The vehicle license tag number, state of issue and the make and type of the vehicle used to deliver the metal property to the purchaser; (f)  A signed statement from the person receiving consideration in the purchase transaction stating that he or she is the rightful owner of the metal property or is entitled to sell the metal property being sold.  Signed statements as required by this section may be collected and recorded on paper, by photographic copy, or other alternative formats as set forth in the rules promulgated by the Secretary of State; (g)  A scanned copy or a photocopy of the personal identification card of the person receiving consideration, or delivering the metal property in the purchase transaction; and (h)  A photograph, videotape or similar likeness of the person receiving consideration or any person other than the seller who delivers the metal property to the purchaser in which the person's facial features are clearly visible and in which the metal property the person is selling or delivering is clearly visible. Such records shall be maintained by the scrap metal dealer or purchaser for not less than two (2) years from the date of the purchase transaction, and such records shall be made available to any law enforcement officer or Secretary of State examiner during usual and customary business hours. (3)  The purchaser shall photographically capture the metal property as it exists when it is acquired by the purchaser.  The time and date shall be digitally recorded on the photograph, and the identity of the person taking the photograph shall be recorded.  The purchaser shall permit any law enforcement officer or Secretary of State examiner to make an inspection of the metal property, if the metal property is still in the purchaser's possession, and of all photographs of the metal property.  Any photograph of metal property taken and maintained pursuant to this subsection shall be admissible in any civil or criminal proceeding. (4)  During the usual and customary business hours of a scrap metal dealer, a law enforcement officer or Secretary of State examiner, after proper identification as a law enforcement officer or Secretary of State examiner, shall have the right to inspect all purchased metal property and all records pertaining to the purchase of regulated metals in the possession of the scrap metal dealer or purchaser. (5)  (a)  Whenever a law enforcement officer has reasonable cause to believe that any item of metal property in the possession of a scrap metal dealer has been stolen, a law enforcement officer who has an affidavit from the alleged rightful owner of the property identifying the property with specificity, including any identifying markings, may issue and deliver a written hold notice to the scrap metal dealer.  The hold notice shall specifically identify those items of metal property that are believed to have been stolen and that are subject to the hold notice.  Upon receipt of the notice, the scrap metal dealer may not process or remove the metal property identified in the notice from the place of business of the scrap metal dealer for fifteen (15) calendar days after receipt of the notice, unless sooner released by a law enforcement officer. (b)  No later than the expiration of the fifteen-day period, a law enforcement officer, after receiving additional substantive evidence beyond the initial affidavit, may issue and deliver a second written hold notice, which shall be an extended hold notice.  The extended hold notice shall specifically identify those items of metal property that are believed to have been stolen and that are subject to the extended hold notice.  Upon receipt of the extended hold notice, the scrap metal dealer may not process or remove the items of metal property identified in the notice from the place of business of the scrap metal dealer for fifteen (15) calendar days after receipt of the extended hold notice, unless sooner released by a law enforcement officer. (c)  At the expiration of the hold period or, if extended in accordance with this subsection, at the expiration of the extended hold period, the hold is automatically released, then the scrap metal dealer may dispose of the metal property unless other disposition has been ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. (d)  If the scrap metal dealer contests the identification or ownership of the metal property, the party other than the scrap metal dealer claiming ownership of any metal property in the possession of a scrap metal dealer, provided that a timely report of the theft of the metal property was made to the proper authorities, may bring a civil action in the circuit court of the county in which the scrap metal dealer or purchaser is located.  The petition for the action shall include the means of identification of the metal property utilized by the petitioner to determine ownership of the metal property in the possession of the scrap metal dealer. (e)  When a lawful owner recovers stolen metal property from a scrap metal dealer who has complied with this section, and the person who sold the metal property to the scrap metal dealer is convicted of a violation of this section, or theft by receiving stolen property under Section 97-17-70, the court shall order the convicted person to make full restitution to the scrap metal dealer, including, without limitation, attorney's fees, court costs and other expenses. (6)  For dealer-to-dealer transactions, records required to be kept include: (a)  Name and address of selling dealer; (b)  Date and place of each acquisition of the metal property; (c)  The weight, quantity, or volume and a general description of the type of metal property; and (d)  The amount or type of consideration given for the metal property by the purchasing dealer. Such records shall be maintained by the scrap metal dealer for not less than two (2) years from the date of the purchase transaction, and such records shall be made available to any law enforcement officer or Secretary of State examiner during usual and customary business hours. (7)  It shall be unlawful for any person to give a false statement of ownership or to give a false or altered identification or vehicle tag number and receive money or other consideration from a scrap metal dealer or other purchaser in return for metal property. (8)  A scrap metal dealer or other purchaser shall not enter into any cash transactions in payment for the purchase of metal property.  Payment shall be made by check issued to the seller of the metal property or by electronic funds transfer. (9)  If a person acquiring metal property fails to maintain the records or to hold such materials as requested by a law enforcement officer under Sections 97-17-71 through 97-17-71.3, such failure shall be prima facie evidence that the person receiving the metal property received it knowing it to be stolen in violation of Section 97-17-70. (10)  It shall be unlawful for any person to transport or cause to be transported for himself or another from any point within this state to any point outside this state any metal property, unless the person or entity first reports to the sheriff of the county from which he departs this state transporting such materials the same information that a purchaser in this state would be required to obtain and keep in a record as set forth in subsection (2) of this section.  In such a case the sheriff receiving the report shall keep the information in records maintained in his office as a public record available for inspection by any person at all reasonable times.  This section shall not apply to a public utility, as that term is defined in Section 77-3-3, engaged in carrying on utility operations; to a railroad, as that term is defined in Section 77-9-5; to a communications service provider, whether wireless or wire line; or to a scrap metal dealer. (11)  It shall be unlawful for a scrap metal dealer or other purchaser to knowingly purchase or possess a metal beer keg, or a metal syrup tank generally used by the soft drink industry, whether damaged or undamaged, or any reasonably recognizable part thereof, on any premises that the dealer uses to buy, sell, store, shred, melt, cut or otherwise alter scrap metal.  However, it shall not be unlawful to purchase or possess a metal syrup tank generally used by the soft drink industry if the scrap metal dealer or other purchaser obtains a bill of sale at the time of purchase from a seller if the seller is a manufacturer of such tanks, a soft drink company or a soft drink distributor. (12)  It shall be unlawful to sell to a scrap metal dealer any bronze vase and/or marker, memorial, statue, plaque, or other bronze object used at a cemetery or other location where deceased persons are interred or memorialized, or for any such dealer to purchase those objects, unless the source of the bronze is known and notice is provided to the municipal or county law enforcement agency where the dealer is located.  The notice shall identify all names, letters, dates and symbols on the bronze and a photograph of the bronze shall be attached thereto.  Written permission from the cemetery and the appropriate law enforcement agency must be received before any type of bronze described in this subsection may be purchased, processed, sold or melted. (13)  (a)  It shall be unlawful for any scrap metal dealer to purchase any manhole cover and other similar types of utility access covers, including storm drain covers, or any metal property clearly identified as belonging to a political subdivision of the state or a municipality, unless that metal property is purchased from the political subdivision, the municipal utility or the manufacturer of the metal. Any purchaser who purchases metal property in bulk shall be allowed twenty-four (24) hours to determine if any metal property prohibited by this subsection is included in a bulk purchase.  If such prohibited metal property is included in a bulk purchase, the purchaser shall notify law enforcement no later than twenty-four (24) hours after the purchase. (b)  It shall be unlawful for a person to sell, or any scrap metal dealer to purchase, any copper telecommunication wire in any form or any metal property clearly identified as belonging to a telecommunications company, unless that metal property is purchased from (i) an electrician or contractor to whom either a license has been issued by a municipality or county in this state or a current certificate of responsibility has been issued by the State Board of Public Contractors; or (ii) a person who holds a demolition permit issued by a municipality or county in this state.  It shall be unlawful for a person to sell, or a scrap metal dealer to purchase, copper telecommunication wire that has been burned to remove the insulation, unless the seller provides certification, on a form as issued by the Secretary of State and signed by a firefighter who is currently in compliance with the certification requirements of the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board or a certified law enforcement officer, that the source of the copper telecommunication wire was from a building destroyed by fire. (14)  It shall be unlawful for a scrap metal dealer or other purchaser to purchase metal property from a person younger than eighteen (18) years of age. (15)  Metal property may not be purchased, acquired or collected between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. (16)  Except as provided in this subsection, any person willfully or knowingly violating the provisions of Sections 97-17-71 through 97-17-71.3 shall, upon conviction thereof, be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per offense, unless the purchase transaction or transactions related to the violation, in addition to any costs which are, or would be, incurred in repairing or in the attempt to recover any property damaged in the theft of or removal of the metal property, including replacement costs of the metal property, are in aggregate an amount which exceeds One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) but less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), in which case the person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed five (5) years, fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both.  Any person found guilty of stealing metal property or receiving metal property, knowing it to be stolen in violation of Section 97-17-70, shall be ordered to make full restitution to the victim, including, without limitation, restitution for property damage that resulted from the theft of the property. (17)  If the purchase transaction or transactions related to the violation, in addition to any costs which are, or would be, incurred in repairing or in the attempt to recover any property damaged in the theft of or removal of the metal property, including replacement costs of the metal property, are in aggregate an amount which exceeds Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) but less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), the person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not less than one (1) year, but not to exceed ten (10) years, fined not more than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), or both. (18)  If the purchase transaction or transactions related to the violation, in addition to any costs which are, or would be, incurred in repairing or in the attempt to recover any property damaged in the theft of or removal of the metal property, including replacement costs of the metal property, are in aggregate an amount which exceeds Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), the person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not less than three (3) years, but not to exceed twenty (20) years, fined not more than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or both. (19)  This section shall not be construed to repeal other criminal laws.  Whenever conduct proscribed by any provision of this section is also proscribed by any other provision of law, the provision which carries the more serious penalty shall be applied. (20)  This section shall apply to all businesses regulated under this section without regard to the location within the State of Mississippi. (21)  Sections 97-17-71 through 97-17-71.3 shall take precedence over any and all local ordinances governing purchase transactions of metal property.  If any municipal or county ordinance, rule or regulation conflicts with the provisions of Sections 97-17-71 through 97-17-71.3, the provisions of Sections 97-17-71 through 97-17-71.3 shall preempt the municipal or county ordinance, rule or regulation. (22)  This section shall be fully applicable to the requirements for the purchase and sale of detached catalytic converters provided in Section 97-17-71.3, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  Section 97-17-71.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-17-71.1.  (1)  (a)  From and after August 7, 2008, it shall be unlawful for any scrap metal dealer or any person who purchases scrap metal, deals in scrap metal, or otherwise engages in the scrap metal business to fail to register with the Secretary of State.  All registrations under this section shall expire two (2) years from the date of the registration or the renewal thereof. (b)  The Secretary of State may promulgate and adopt such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and establish such registration and renewal fees as are adequate to cover the administrative costs associated with the registration program. (c)  The Secretary of State may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew any registration following notice to the applicant or registrant in accordance with the promulgated rules and an opportunity for a hearing for any failure to comply with this section, or for other good cause. (2)  A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) but not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for the first offense.  Any person who shall be guilty of any subsequent violations of this section requiring registration shall be guilty of a felony offense and shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed three (3) years, fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both. (3)  (a)  To register or renew registration, the registrant must declare, under penalty of perjury, whether such registrant has ever been convicted of any felony offense, or any misdemeanor offense involving fraud, dishonesty, or deceit within five (5) years preceding the date of application.  If the registrant is a business entity, the registrant shall make the same declarations on behalf of every owner of the business who participates in the operation or management of the business. (b)  (i)  An applicant who has been convicted of an offense as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be prohibited from registering under this section for five (5) years from the date of conviction. (ii)  Any false statement submitted to the Secretary of State for the purpose of unlawfully registering under this section shall be punished as perjury in the manner provided in Section 97-9-61, and a person so convicted shall be disqualified for life from registering as a scrap metal dealer under this section. (4)  The Secretary of State shall immediately report any suspected criminal violation accompanied by all relevant records to the Office of Attorney General and the appropriate district attorney for further proceedings. (5)  It is unlawful for a person to make or cause to be made, in a record or statement that is used or obtained in an examination, action, proceeding, or filed under this section, a statement that, at the time and in light of the circumstances under which it is made, is false or misleading in a material respect, or, in connection with the statement, to omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statement made, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, not false or misleading. (6)  The Secretary of State shall have the authority to: (a)  Conduct and carry out criminal background history verification of the information provided by the applicant or registrant and to require the submission of information and forms from the applicant or registrant in order to accomplish the registration duties imposed by this section; (b)  Require or permit a person to testify, file a statement, or produce a record, under oath or otherwise, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning a matter to be investigated or about which an action or proceeding is to be instituted; (c)  Issue a cease and desist order, with a prior hearing, against the scrap metal dealer or other purchaser alleged to be in violation of this section, directing the person or persons to cease and desist from further illegal activity.  When an immediate cease and desist order is issued, the Secretary of State shall hold an administrative hearing on the alleged violations within fifteen (15) business days; (d)  (i)  Issue an order against any scrap metal dealer or other purchaser for any violation of this section, imposing an administrative penalty up to a maximum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense.  Each violation shall be considered a separate offense in a single proceeding or a series of related proceedings.  Any administrative penalty, plus reimbursement for all costs and expenses incurred in the investigation of the violation and any administrative proceedings, shall be paid to the Secretary of State; (ii)  For the purpose of determining the amount or extent of a sanction, if any, to be imposed under paragraph (c)(i) of this subsection, the Secretary of State shall consider, among other factors, the frequency, persistence and willfulness of the conduct constituting a violation of this section or any rule or order hereunder; the number of persons adversely affected by the conduct; and the resources of the person committing the violation; (e)  Bring an action in chancery court to enjoin the acts or practices complained of to enforce compliance with this section or any rule promulgated or order entered hereunder.  Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets.  In addition, upon a proper showing by the Secretary of State, the court may enter an order of rescission or restitution directed to any person who has engaged in any act constituting a violation of any provision of this section or any rule or order hereunder, or the court may impose a civil penalty up to a maximum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense, provided that each violation shall be considered as a separate offense in a single proceeding or a series of related proceedings.  The court may not require the Secretary of State to post a bond. (7)  Any person aggrieved by a final order of the Secretary of State may obtain a review of the order in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, by filing in the court, within thirty (30) days after the entry of the order, a written petition praying that the order be modified or set aside, in whole or in part.  A copy of the petition shall be forthwith served upon the Secretary of State and thereupon the Secretary of State shall certify and file in court a copy of the filing and evidence upon which the order was entered.  When these have been filed, the court has exclusive jurisdiction to affirm, modify, enforce or set aside the order, in whole or in part. SECTION 4.  Section 97-17-71.2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-17-71.2.  (1)  It is an offense for a scrap metal dealer to pay cash to a person who presents an air conditioner evaporator coil or condenser, in whole or in part, for sale as scrap. (2)  Scrap metal described in subsection (1) may only be sold for scrap by an authorized agent, representative or employee of one (1) of the following: (a)  A licensed HVAC contractor who acquired the evaporator coil or condenser in the performance as a contractor as defined in Section 31-3-1; (b)  A company meeting all local or municipal requirements to obtain a permit from that jurisdiction to repair, replace and install HVAC units containing copper evaporator coils or condensers; (c)  Where the jurisdiction does not require a permit to repair, replace and install HVAC units containing copper evaporator coils or condensers, by a company holding a privilege license indicating the business as that of an HVAC installer or repairer; or (d)  A company holding a privilege license indicating the business as that of an HVAC installer or repairer. (3)  The person offering an air conditioner evaporator coil or condenser for sale as scrap on behalf of a company listed in subsection (2) shall have in the person's possession documentation that the company for whom it is being sold is a company described in subsection (2), and that the person selling the evaporator coil or condenser is an authorized agent, representative or employee of that company. (4)  Payment for scrap metal described in subsection (1) must be made by check or money order, and the name of the company or the individual meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this section must be the payee on the check. (5)  (a)  A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per offense. (b)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a person violating this section from also being prosecuted for any other applicable criminal offense. (6)  Any purchase of any air conditioner evaporator coil or condenser, as described in this section, in whole or in part, is subject to the record keeping requirements required by Section 97-17-71. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.